Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 4 Foreclosure of Mortgages and Power of Sale

Cross references. —

As to deeds, mortgages and leases generally, see chapter 2 of this title. See also the cross references at the beginning of chapter 2 of this title.

As to deeds of trust, see chapter 3 of this title.

As to trustee's sale under deed of trust, see §§

34-3-102

to

34-3-104

.

As to venue in action for the sale of real property under a mortgage, lien or other encumbrance or charge, see §

1-5-101

.

As to sale and redemption of real property sold under mortgage or execution, see §§

1-18-101

to

1-18-112

.

As to amount and priority of lien acquired by purchase at tax sale, and as to civil action to foreclose same, see §

39-13-108

.

As to foreclosure of tax connection with irrigation and drainage districts generally, see §§

41-6-503

to

41-6-507

.

Remedy of mortgagee. —

A mortgagee's only remedy upon mortgage default is foreclosure and public sale, either by power of sale pursuant to this article or by judicial sale in accordance with §

1-18-101

et seq. Sannerud v. Brantz, 928 P.2d 477,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1996).

Deficiency judgment allowed when foreclosure proper. —

Deficiency judgments after foreclosure by advertisement and sale, on deeds of trust or purchase money mortgages, are allowed when the foreclosure and sale was proper and equitable. Fitch v. Buffalo Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 751 P.2d 1309,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Real Estate — The Wyoming Installment Land Contract: A Mortgage in Sheep's Clothing? or What You See Isn't What You Get. Metropolitan Mortgage & Securities Co. v. Belgrade, 816 P.2d 868,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1991),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 309 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

54 Am. Jur. 2d Mortgages §§ 512 to 942.

Estoppel of or waiver by parties or participants regarding irregularities in foreclosure sale, 2 A.L.R.2d 6.

Cost of foreclosure as covered by guaranty of payment at maturity, 4 ALR2d 138.

What constitutes “public sale,” 4 ALR2d 575.

Attachment, garnishment, execution or similar process in action of note or bond, not resulting in sale of mortgaged property, as precluding foreclosure of real estate mortgage, 37 ALR2d 959.

Effect of purchase of property by pledgee on foreclosure of mortgage held as collateral security, 37 ALR2d 1381.

Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act of 1940, as amended, as affecting foreclosure of mortgages and trust deeds, 40 ALR2d 1262.

Foreclosure of mortgage or trust deed as affecting easement claimed in, over or under property, 46 ALR2d 1197.

Effect of foreclosure on dedication of land by mortgagor, 63 ALR2d 1160.

Propriety of appointing receiver, at behest of mortgagee, to manage or operate property during foreclosure action, 82 ALR2d 1075.

Mortgagor's interference with property subject to order of foreclosure and sale as contempt of court, 54 ALR3d 1242.

Failure to keep up insurance as justifying foreclosure under acceleration provision in mortgage or deed of trust, 69 ALR3d 774.

Validity and enforceability of due-on-sale real-estate mortgage provisions, 61 ALR4th 1070.

Mortgage foreclosure forbearance statutes — modern status, 83 ALR4th 243.

Discharge of mortgage and taking back of new mortgage as affecting lien intervening between old and new mortgages, 43 ALR5th 519.

59 C.J.S. Mortgages §§ 490 to 574; 59A C.J.S. Mortgages 575 to 990.

§ 34-4-101.
Application.

The provisions of this act [§§

34-4-101

through

34-4-109

,

34-4-111

,

34-4-113

] shall apply to all mortgages containing a power of sale executed prior to the passage thereof, not having been foreclosed, and nothing in this act contained shall be construed as limiting the power of parties to a mortgage to provide therein as they may see fit as to the manner of foreclosure and sale, and when such provision is made, foreclosure and sale may be made in accordance therewith, or in accordance with the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 72, § 16; R.S. 1887, § 51; R.S. 1899, § 2794; C.S. 1910, § 3686; C.S. 1920, § 4644; R.S. 1931, § 71-216; C.S. 1945, § 59-213; W.S. 1957, § 34-67.

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948); McNeill Family Trust v. Centura Bank, 2003 WY 2, 60 P.3d 1277,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

In re Various Water Rights in Lake De Smet Reservoir, 623 P.2d 764,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1981); Cliff & Co. v. Anderson, 777 P.2d 595,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1989); Resolution Trust Corp. v. Love, 36 F.3d 972,

1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 27000

(10th Cir. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Superfund — Your Friendly Hometown Lender? The Liability of Financial Institutions under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 493 (1989).

§ 34-4-102.
Foreclosure by advertisement.

Every mortgage of real estate, containing therein a power of sale upon default being made in any condition thereof, may be foreclosed by advertisement within ten (10) years after the maturing of such mortgage or the debt secured thereby, or after the recording thereof, in the cases and in the manner hereinafter specified.

The time within which such proceeding may be commenced under the power of sale shall begin to run:

As to any mortgage executed after May 21, 1945, from the date of such mortgage, unless the maturity of the debt or obligation secured by such mortgage be clearly stated in or is otherwise readily ascertainable from the provisions of such mortgage;

As to any mortgage executed prior to May 21, 1945, at the latest of the following dates:
(ii) (A) As to any mortgage executed prior to May 21, 1945, at the latest of the following dates:

The tenth anniversary of the maturity of the debt or obligation secured by such mortgage if clearly stated in or otherwise readily ascertainable from the provisions of the mortgage;

The tenth anniversary of the recording of the mortgage if no such maturity date is clearly stated in or readily ascertainable from the provisions of the mortgage;

The stated, renewed, or extended maturity date recorded on or before December 31, 1971, in the manner provided in subdivision (B)(II) of this paragraph.

The owner and holder of any debt or obligation secured by a mortgage executed prior to May 21, 1945, the maturity date of which either:

Is not clearly stated or otherwise readily ascertainable; or

Has been renewed or extended by agreement, payment, or other act of the debtor, may, on or before December 31, 1971, record in the office of the county clerk in the county in which such real estate is located either:

An agreement signed and acknowledged by the debtor as a conveyance of real estate, stating the agreed, renewed or extended maturity date of such debt or obligation; or

An affidavit of the owner and holder of such debt or obligation, stating such maturity date and the date, form or manner of the agreement, payment or other act of the debtor fixing such date.

No mortgage in which the maturity of the debt or obligation is not clearly stated or otherwise readily ascertainable, which was recorded on or before May 21, 1945, and for which no stated, renewed or extended maturity date is recorded on or before December 31, 1971, may be foreclosed by advertisement after December 31, 1971; and no such mortgage recorded after May 21, 1945, may be foreclosed by advertisement commenced more than ten (10) years after the date of such recording.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 72, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 36; R.S. 1899, § 2778; C.S. 1910, § 3670; C.S. 1920, § 4627; R.S. 1931, § 71-205; Laws 1945, ch. 122, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 59-201; W.S. 1957, § 34-68; Laws 1971, ch. 152, § 1.

The 1945 amendment to this section operates prospectively

and not retroactively. National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1948).

And does not apply to mortgage maturing prior to its enactment. —

Where a mortgage containing a power of sale had matured prior to the enactment of the 1945 amendment to this section, contention was held without merit that the section as amended did apply. National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1948).

Methods of foreclosing mortgages. —

Under Wyoming law two methods of foreclosing mortgages are customarily used, one by an action in court and the other by the exercise of a power of sale under this section and §§

34-4-101

and

34-4-103

to

34-4-113

, when that is given by the terms of the instrument. National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1948).

Avoiding foreclosure. —

Mortgagor and mortgagee may make fair contract avoiding necessity of foreclosure. Ditto v. Bank of Gillette, 38 Wyo. 120, 264 P. 1013,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1928); Fitch v. Ditto, 38 Wyo. 134, 264 P. 1017,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1928).

Sale valid although personalty sold was not advertised. —

A sale of mortgaged real estate under a power of sale was valid though advertisement did not state that personal property consisting of liquors, tobaccos and beverages was also to be sold where both the deed and the mortgage included the liquor, tobaccos and beverages as a part of the described real estate. Hill v. Salmon, 69 Wyo. 1, 236 P.2d 518,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1951).

Whether deed construed as mortgage. —

Where a mortgagor, being unable to pay the debt, executed an absolute deed to the property to the mortgagees, who received deed in payment of the debt and agreed that, in case the property should sell for more than enough to pay their claim, interest, taxes, etc., they would account to the mortgagor for the surplus, conveyance could not be treated as a mortgage in equity. Weltner v. Thurmond, 17 Wyo. 268, 98 P. 590,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 17 Wyo. 310, 98 P. 601,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1908).

Contract recitals of prior indebtedness and giving of deed in payment to avoid foreclosure are entitled to consideration on issue whether deed should be declared mortgage. Ditto v. Bank of Gillette, 38 Wyo. 120, 264 P. 1013,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1928); Fitch v. Ditto, 38 Wyo. 134, 264 P. 1017,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1928).

Mortgagors not repurchasing property within contract time are not entitled to have deed, made to avoid foreclosure, declared mortgage in action brought just before time expired. Ditto v. Bank of Gillette, 38 Wyo. 120, 264 P. 1013,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1928); Fitch v. Ditto, 38 Wyo. 134, 264 P. 1017,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1928).

Mortgagors' promise to repurchase land would not require finding that deed, executed to avoid foreclosure, was intended as security for debt. Ditto v. Bank of Gillette, 38 Wyo. 120, 264 P. 1013,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1928); Fitch v. Ditto, 38 Wyo. 134, 264 P. 1017,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1928).

Parties executing deed, with right of repurchase, to avoid expense of foreclosure, were not entitled to have it declared a mortgage. Ditto v. Bank of Gillette, 38 Wyo. 120, 264 P. 1013,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1928); Fitch v. Ditto, 38 Wyo. 134, 264 P. 1017,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1928).

Formerly section did not provide time limit for exercising power of sale. —

Prior to the amendment of this section by ch. 122, Laws 1945, there was no statute limiting the time within which the right to exercise a power of sale contained in a mortgage or trust deed might be invoked. National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1948).

Applied

in

Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1950).

Law reviews. —

For a note dealing with limitation on foreclosure of a real estate mortgage by advertisement under a bill of sale, see 1 Wyo. L.J. 129.

§ 34-4-103.
Prerequisites to foreclosure.

To entitle any party to give a notice as hereinafter prescribed and to make such foreclosure, it is requisite:

That some default in a condition of such mortgage has occurred by which the power to sell became operative;

That no suit or proceeding has been instituted at law to recover the debt then remaining secured by such mortgage, or any part thereof, or if any suit or proceeding has been instituted, that the same has been discontinued, or that an execution upon the judgment rendered therein has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part;

That the mortgage containing the power of sale has been duly recorded; and if it has been assigned, that all assignments have been recorded; and

That written notice of intent to foreclose the mortgage by advertisement and sale has been served upon the record owner, and the person in possession of the mortgaged premises if different than the record owner, by certified mail with return receipt, mailed to the last known address of the record owner and the person in possession at least ten (10) days before commencement of publication of notice of sale. Proof of compliance with this subsection shall be by affidavit.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 72, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 37; R.S. 1899, § 2779; C.S. 1910, § 3671; C.S. 1920, § 4628; R.S. 1931, § 71-206; C.S. 1945, § 59-202; W.S. 1957, § 34-69; Laws 1977, ch. 123, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

Actual notice. —

Strict compliance
with the notice requirement of this section is unnecessary when a
party has actual notice of intent to foreclose. ORO Mgmt., LLC v. R.C. Mineral & Rock, LLC, 2013 WY 77, 304 P.3d 925,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2013).

In an action
to set aside a foreclosure sale, the district court properly granted
summary judgment for the assignee of the mortgage; the failure by
the assignee of the mortgage to send written notice of its intent
to foreclose to the property owner did not provide a legal basis to
set aside the summary judgment as the property owner had actual notice. ORO Mgmt., LLC v. R.C. Mineral & Rock, LLC, 2013 WY 77, 304 P.3d 925,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2013).

Cross references. —

As to recordation of conveyances generally, see §§

34-1-118

to

34-1-123

.

As to recording assignments of mortgages, see §

34-1-128

.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “and” at the end of (a)(ii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

Senate Enrolled Act No. 107 of the 1989 general session of the legislature purported to amend this section so as to add additional prerequisites to foreclosure, relating to those persons who are entitled to receive notice, but this bill was vetoed by the governor.

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

The term “proceeding” as used in this section

is a broad term, but its meaning is limited in the section, and must be one instituted at law. Denver Joint Stock Land Bank v. Preston, 52 Wyo. 132, 70 P.2d 584,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1937).

Filing claim against estate as not precluding foreclosure. —

Filing of claim against an estate is in the nature of a demand, a condition precedent to commencement of action, and does not constitute commencement of an action so as to preclude the foreclosure of a mortgage under a power of sale contained therein. Denver Joint Stock Land Bank v. Preston, 52 Wyo. 132, 70 P.2d 584,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1937).

Actual notice. —

There is no provision in subsection (a)(iv) that prohibits actual notice of intent to foreclose other than by mailing to the last known address of the record owner. Walker v. McAnnany, 802 P.2d 876,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1990).

Mortgagor who had actual notice from his partner of the mortgagee's intent to foreclose was not prejudiced by his having actual notice rather than receiving a notice by certified mail. Walker v. McAnnany, 802 P.2d 876,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1990).

Prerequisites satisfied. —

Summary judgment in favor of a bank on a landowner's fraudulent foreclosure claim was proper where the landowner did not make payments on the promissory note, no lawsuit or proceeding was instituted to recover the debt, and the bank wrote him a letter, which constituted actual notice of the assignment of the promissory note and the pending foreclosure on the property. Bitker v. First Nat'l Bank, 2004 WY 114, 98 P.3d 853,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 2004).

Mortgagee was entitled to rely on the mortgagor's address

listed in the purchase agreement, and was not required to make an extensive search for a new address when the notice of intent to foreclose, sent by certified mail, was returned with a notation that the mortgagor had moved and left no forwarding address. Walker v. McAnnany, 802 P.2d 876,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1990).

Notice to corporation's officers not satisfactory. —

Statutory notice furnished to individuals who were officers (one of whom also was a director and counsel) of a corporation did not satisfy the statutory requirement of notice to the corporation. Ulery-Williams, Inc. v. First Wyo. Bank, N.A.-Laramie, 748 P.2d 740,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1988).

Foreclosure invalid if mortgage not recorded. —

Under this section a mortgage foreclosure sale by advertisement under power of sale contained in the mortgage is invalid as between the parties, unless the mortgage containing such power has been fully recorded and, as a prerequisite, such mortgage must have been entitled to record. Harney v. Montgomery, 29 Wyo. 362, 213 P. 378,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1923).

Summary judgment setting aside foreclosure reversed. —

Summary judgment in favor of the mortgagee, setting aside a foreclosure sale of real property, was reversed because the mortgagee did not come with clean hands, it failed to show that it had no adequate remedy at law, and the parties could not have been substantially returned to their presale status. McNeill Family Trust v. Centura Bank, 2003 WY 2, 60 P.3d 1277,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948).

§ 34-4-104.
Publication and service of notices; generally.

Notice that the mortgage will be foreclosed by a sale of the mortgaged premises, or some part of them, shall be given by publishing the notice for four (4) consecutive weeks, at least once in each week, in a newspaper printed in the county where the premises included in the mortgage and intended to be sold, or some part of them, are situated, if there be one; and if no newspaper be printed in the county, then notice shall be published in a paper printed in the state and of general circulation in the county. Prior to first date of publication, a copy of the notice shall be served by certified mail with return receipt requested upon the record owner, the person in possession of mortgaged premises, if different than the record owner, and all holders of recorded mortgages and liens subordinate to the mortgage being foreclosed, which appear of record at least twenty-five (25) days before the scheduled foreclosure sale. The notice shall be sent to the last known address for the addressee, which shall be the address set forth in the mortgage or lien filed of record unless another address has been recorded in the real estate records or has been provided to the foreclosing mortgagee or lienholder. Proof of compliance with this section shall be made by affidavit of an authorized representative of the foreclosing mortgagee or lienholder. A person or entity who acts in reliance upon the affidavit without knowledge that the representations contained therein are incorrect shall not be liable to any person for so acting and may assume without inquiry the existence of the facts contained in the affidavit.

If there are sale proceeds in excess of the amount necessary to pay the foreclosing mortgagee, judgment creditor or other lienor in full, then within ten (10) business days following the sale of real estate by foreclosure, the foreclosing mortgagee or lienholder shall serve a copy of the sale results to the record owner of the mortgaged premises and all holders of recorded mortgages and liens subordinate to the mortgage or lien being foreclosed. Sale results shall be sent by certified mail with return receipt requested to the last known address for the addressee, which shall be the address set forth in the mortgage or lien filed of record unless another address has been recorded in the real estate records or has been provided in writing to the foreclosing mortgagee or lienholder. The sale results shall include the amount due the foreclosing mortgagee or lienholder as of the date of sale, the name of the successful bidder and the amount of the successful bid. If the certificate of sale awarded to the successful bidder includes the required information, the foreclosing mortgagee or lienholder may comply with this section by serving a copy of the certificate of sale.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 72, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 38; R.S. 1899, § 2780; C.S. 1910, § 3672; C.S. 1920, § 4629; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 64; R.S. 1931, § 71-207; C.S. 1945, § 59-203; W.S. 1957, § 34-70; Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to application of this section to sales under deeds of trust, see §

34-3-103

.

As to publication of notices required by law, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, and applicable to real estate mortgage foreclosures and execution sales commenced on or after that date, redesignated former undesignated paragraph as (a), and in (a), added the last four sentences; added (b); and made stylistic changes.

Mortgagor not deprived of substantial right by shortening time for publication. —

Shortening time for publication of notice of mortgage foreclosure sale, from 6 weeks to 4 weeks, does not deprive mortgagor of any substantial right as it does not shorten period of redemption, although it does shorten by 2 weeks the period which the mortgagor may remain in possession. James v. Chapman, 50 Wyo. 210, 58 P.2d 439,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1936).

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948); McNeill Family Trust v. Centura Bank, 2003 WY 2, 60 P.3d 1277,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 34-4-105.
Publication of notice; contents.

Every such notice shall include:

The names of the mortgagor and of the mortgagee and the assignee of the mortgage if any;

The date of the mortgage and when recorded;

The amount claimed to be due thereon at the date of the notice;

A description of the mortgaged premises, conforming substantially with that contained in the mortgage;

The time and place of sale; and

A statement that “The property being foreclosed upon may be subject to other liens and encumbrances that will not be extinguished at the sale and any prospective purchaser should research the status of title before submitting a bid.”

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 72, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 39; R.S. 1899, § 2781; C.S. 1910, § 3673; C.S. 1920, § 4630; R.S. 1931, § 71-208; C.S. 1945, § 59-204; W.S. 1957, § 34-71; Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, and applicable to real estate mortgage foreclosures and execution sales commenced on or after that date, in (a), substituted “include” for “specify”; added (a)(vi); and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Statement of recordation. —

The notice of foreclosure must contain a statement as to when the mortgage was recorded. Harney v. Montgomery, 29 Wyo. 362, 213 P. 378,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1923).

Heading and signature not required. —

This section requires five (now six) items of information to be included in a foreclosure notice. Neither a heading nor a signature is required. Williams v. First Wyo. Bank, N.A., 742 P.2d 197,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 503

(Wyo. 1987).

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948).

Cited

in

Hill v. Salmon, 69 Wyo. 1, 236 P.2d 518,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1951).

§ 34-4-106.
Time, place and manner of sale generally; mortgagee, judgment creditor or lienor shall be present or waive.

The sale shall be at public vendue, between the hour of ten (10:00) o’clock in the forenoon, and five (5:00) o’clock in the afternoon, at the front door of the courthouse, or the place of holding the district court of the county within the county in which the premises to be sold, or some part of them, are situated, and shall be made by the person appointed for that purpose in the mortgage or by the sheriff or deputy sheriff of the county, to the highest bidder. The sheriff or deputy sheriff shall not hold the sale unless the foreclosing mortgagee, judgment creditor, other foreclosing lienor or an authorized agent of the foreclosing party is present at the sale or has previously waived to the sheriff conducting the sale the right to appear and bid at the sale. The sheriff conducting the sale shall not be considered to be the authorized agent of the foreclosing party unless the foreclosing party has given the sheriff a specified opening bid to be presented by the sheriff on behalf of the foreclosing party and the sheriff actually presents the opening bid. Any foreclosure sale conducted without complying with the terms of this section is void, in which case the mortgage, power of sale, judgment or other lien which is the subject of the voided sale is not extinguished or exhausted, but may be properly foreclosed in a subsequent foreclosure sale in compliance with applicable law.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 72, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 40; R.S. 1899, § 2782; C.S. 1910, § 3674; C.S. 1920, § 4631; R.S. 1931, § 71-209; C.S. 1945, § 59-205; W.S. 1957, § 34-72; Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, and applicable to real estate mortgage foreclosures and execution sales commenced on or after that date, substituted “ten (10:00) o'clock” for “nine (9:00)”, and added the last three sentences.

Sale by undersheriff valid. —

An undersheriff is in effect a deputy sheriff, so that a sale and deed executed by such undersheriff is valid. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Deed executed by undersheriff valid. —

Undersheriff acting as auctioneer also acted as deputy sheriff and had authority to execute a deed, as he is not a mortgage holder. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948).

Quoted

in

Kottcamp v. Fleet Real Estate Funding Corp., 783 P.2d 170,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes public sale, 4 ALR2d 575.

§ 34-4-107.
Manner in which distinct tracts or lots sold.

If the mortgaged premises consist of distinct tracts or lots the foreclosing mortgagee may offer for sale separately sufficient tracts or lots as shall be necessary to satisfy the amount due on such mortgage at the date of the notice of sale, with interest and costs and expenses allowed by law, or the foreclosing mortgagee may offer all such distinct tracts or lots to be sold as a whole.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 72, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 42; R.S. 1899, § 2784; C.S. 1910, § 3676; C.S. 1920, § 4633; Laws 1931, ch. 43, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 71-211; C.S. 1945, § 59-207; W.S. 1957, § 34-73; 2011, ch. 173, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to redemption of property in parcels, see §

1-18-105

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote the section by substituting “the foreclosing mortgagee may offer” for “they shall be first offered,” “sufficient tracts or lots as shall be” for “and no more tracts or lots shall be sold than shall be,” and “or the foreclosing mortgagee may offer all such distinct tracts or lots to be” for “provided, however, that in the event the aggregate of bids on such distinct tracts or lots is not sufficient to satisfy said amount due, all such distinct tracts or lots shall be offered and.”

Provision requiring distinct tracts to be sold separately does not apply to proceedings in court

where confirmation of foreclosure sale must be had and parties are afforded full opportunity to object to manner in which sale was conducted. Bank of Commerce v. Williams, 52 Wyo. 1, 69 P.2d 525,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1937).

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Foreclosure sale of mortgaged real estate as whole or in parcels, 61 ALR2d 505.

§ 34-4-108.
Mortgagee may purchase; by whom sale made; mortgagee, judgment creditor or lienor shall be present or waive.

The mortgagee, his assigns, or his or their legal representatives may fairly and in good faith, purchase the premises sold upon foreclosure of any mortgage by advertisement under power of sale or any part thereof, at the sale; and whenever the mortgage shall provide for the mortgagee to sell the premises at the foreclosure sale, notwithstanding the provision, the sale may be made by the sheriff, or deputy sheriff, or by the mortgagee at the option of the latter. The sale shall be postponed, if the foreclosing mortgagee, judgment creditor or other foreclosing lienor, or an authorized agent of the foreclosing mortgagee, judgment creditor or other foreclosing lienor, is not present at the sale or has not previously waived in writing the right to appear and bid at the sale.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 72, § 8; R.S. 1887, § 43; R.S. 1899, § 2785; C.S. 1910, § 3677; C.S. 1920, § 4634; R.S. 1931, § 71-212; C.S. 1945, § 59-208; W.S. 1957, § 34-74; Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, and applicable to real estate mortgage foreclosures and execution sales commenced on or after that date, added the last sentence and made stylistic changes.

Claim for breach of duty of good faith. —

In a complaint for declaratory relief, mortgagee of a second mortgage on a property failed to state a claim upon which relief could be granted for breach of a duty of good faith on the part of the mortgagee of the first mortgage that purchased the property at foreclosure sale but paid less than fair value where the complaint alleged the latter purchased the subject property for an amount it knew to be less than the property's true value, but did not allege either fraud, partiality, or oppression, that the sale was conducted illegally, or that there was less than a full and fair opportunity for competitive bidding. Manion v. Chase Manhattan Mortg. Corp., 2002 WY 49, 43 P.3d 576,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2002).

Deed executed by undersheriff valid. —

An undersheriff is in effect a deputy sheriff, so that a sale and deed executed by such undersheriff is valid. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

The undersheriff acting as auctioneer also acted as deputy sheriff and had authority to execute a deed, as he is not a mortgage holder. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Presence of mortgagee not required. —

There is no indication in the statutes that a foreclosure sale is invalid if the mortgagee<=nder does not attend the sale. McNeill Family Trust v. Centura Bank, 2003 WY 2, 60 P.3d 1277,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of purchase of property by pledgee on foreclosure of mortgage holder's collateral security, 37 ALR2d 1381.

§ 34-4-109.
Postponement of sale.

A foreclosure sale may be postponed from time to time by inserting a notice of the postponement as soon as practicable in the newspaper in which the original advertisement was published and continuing the publication until the time to which the sale shall be postponed, at the expense of the party requesting the postponement, provided that the original advertisement is published at least once a week, over four (4) consecutive weeks, and the notice of postponement is published at least once a week, over two (2) consecutive weeks.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 72, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 41; R.S. 1899, § 2783; C.S. 1910, § 3675; C.S. 1920, § 4632; R.S. 1931, § 71-210; C.S. 1945, § 59-206; W.S. 1957, § 34-75; Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, and applicable to real estate mortgage foreclosures and execution sales commenced on or after that date, substituted “A foreclosure sale” for “Such sale,” added the proviso, and made stylistic changes.

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948).

§ 34-4-110.
Successor to officer making sale may execute conveyance.

If the term of service of the officer who makes sale of any lands and tenements as provided in chapter 243 of the Wyoming Compiled Statutes of 1910 expires, or if such officer die, be absent or unable for any cause to make a deed of conveyance of the property sold, any successor of such officer may execute such conveyance.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 27, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4637; R.S. 1931, § 89-2973; C.S. 1945, § 59-209; W.S. 1957, § 34-76.

Cross references. —

For authority of succeeding officer to make deed in connection with lien of judgment, see §

1-17-329

.

As to execution of process by sheriff and deputies, see §

18-3-604

.

Editor's notes. —

“Chapter 243 of the Wyoming Compiled Statutes of 1910,” appears herein as §§

34-1-105

,

34-1-122

,

34-1-130

,

34-2-107

to

34-2-113

,

34-2-124

,

34-3-101

to

34-4-109

,

34-4-111

and

34-4-113

.

Savings clauses. —

Section 2, Laws 1915, ch. 27, read: “All deeds of conveyance heretofore executed in this state in conformity with the provision of the foregoing section are hereby legalized and made binding upon the parties in interest in all respects.”

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948).

§ 34-4-111.
Costs and expenses; generally.

The costs and expenses of the foreclosure sale, which shall be paid out of the proceeds of the sale, shall include the costs of advertising, the fee of the officer or person making the sale and executing the deed, said fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00); and an attorney or solicitor’s fee if there be a stipulation therefor in the mortgage.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 72, § 10; R.S. 1887, § 45; R.S. 1899, § 2788; C.S. 1910, § 3680; C.S. 1920, § 4638; R.S. 1931, § 71-213; C.S. 1945, § 59-210; W.S. 1957, § 34-77.

Attorney's fee. —

Costs and expenses, including attorney's fee, in mortgages, when so provided for, are contractual rights, and part of indebtedness to be satisfied, provided such right has accrued, and the right then continues, without regard to any form that a resulting action may take. Yellowstone Sheep Co. v. Ellis, 55 Wyo. 63, 96 P.2d 895,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1939).

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948).

§ 34-4-112.
Costs and expenses; attorney's fees.

Whenever an attorney’s fee is provided for in any real or chattel mortgage, or the note or notes secured thereby, such attorney’s fee shall not be allowed or added to the mortgage debt in any foreclosure by public advertisement and sale, unless it shall appear by the affidavit of an attorney admitted generally to practice in this state representing the mortgagee or his assigns in such foreclosures, or the party instituting such foreclosure, which affidavit shall be filed with the sheriff or person who shall conduct the sale under such foreclosure, and said affidavit shall state therein that there has been and is no agreement, express or implied, between such attorney and his client, nor between him and any other person except a practicing attorney of this state engaged with him as an attorney in the foreclosure proceeding, for any sharing or division of said fee so to be allowed or added to the debt involved, and said fee when so allowed or added to the debt shall be only as compensation for services actually rendered in the foreclosure proceeding by an attorney admitted to practice in this state and residing therein. Provided, however, that in the foreclosure of real estate mortgages, this section shall in no wise affect the title to the real estate involved in such a foreclosure.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 102, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 71-214; C.S. 1945, § 59-211; W.S. 1957, § 34-78.

Attorney fees are contractual rights. —

Costs and expenses, including attorney's fee, in mortgages, when so provided for, are contractual rights, and part of indebtedness to be satisfied, provided such right has accrued, and right then continues, without regard to any form that resulting action may take. Yellowstone Sheep Co. v. Ellis, 55 Wyo. 63, 96 P.2d 895,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1939).

Foreclosure notice overstating attorney fees not fraudulent. —

Where mortgage foreclosure notice stated $3,500 was due as attorney's fees and only $1,250 was actually paid, it was held not fraudulent. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948).

Quoted

in

Burk v. Burzynski, 672 P.2d 419,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 385

(Wyo. 1983).